Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Limitations on authority of local governments to regulate certain auxiliary containers.

§ 17-1-71
Definitions.

As used in Sections 17-1-71 through 17-1-75:

“Auxiliary container”means a bag, cup, bottle or other packaging, whether reusable or single-use,that meets both of the following requirements:

Is made of cloth, paper,plastic, cardboard, corrugated material, aluminum, glass, postconsumerrecycled material, or similar material or substrates, including coated,laminated or multilayer substrates; and

Is designed for transporting,consuming or protecting merchandise, food or beverages from or ata food service, including manufacturing, distribution or further processing,retail facility.

“Local unit ofgovernment” means a county, municipality, local taxing entityor any local political subdivision thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 388, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 17-1-73.
Limitations on authority of local governments to regulate the use, disposition or sale of, or prohibit, restrict, or impose fee, charge or tax on certain auxiliary containers.

Subject to Section 17-1-75, a local unit of government shall not adopt or enforcean ordinance that does any of the following:

Regulates the use, dispositionor sale of auxiliary containers.

Prohibits or restrictsauxiliary containers.

Imposes a fee, chargeor tax on auxiliary containers, or additional sales tax to consumers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 388, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 17-1-75.
Construction of Section 17-1-73.

Section 17-1-73 shall not be construed to prohibit or restrict any of the following:

A curbside recyclingprogram.

A designated residentialor commercial recycling location.

A commercial recyclingprogram.

Section 17-1-73 does not apply to any of the following;

An ordinance that prohibitslittering as described in Sections 97-15-29, 97-15-30 and 97-15-31.

The use of auxiliary containers on propertyowned by a local unit of government.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 388, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2018.